Hawaii statutes.
§291E-63 Records of suspensions and
revocations of operating privileges to be maintained. The court shall
notify the department of land and natural resources of any sanctions imposed
for offenses or violations under this part and the period of suspension or
revocation of operator privileges ordered by the court under this part. [L
2000, c 189, pt of §23; am L 2001, c 157, §27]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next